Vermont statutes. Title 33 Human Services
Chapter 51. General Provisions

§ 5101.
Purposes.

The juvenile judicial proceedings chapters shall be construed in accordance with the following purposes:

to provide for the care, protection, education, and healthy mental, physical, and social development of children coming within the provisions of the juvenile judicial proceedings chapters;

to remove from children committing delinquent acts the taint of criminality and the consequences of criminal behavior and to provide supervision, care, and rehabilitation that ensure:

balanced attention to the protection of the community;

accountability to victims and the community for offenses; and

the development of competencies to enable children to become responsible and productive members of the community;

to preserve the family and to separate a child from his or her parents only when necessary to protect the child from serious harm or in the interests of public safety;

to ensure that safety and timely permanency for children are the paramount concerns in the administration and conduct of proceedings under the juvenile judicial proceedings chapters;

to achieve the foregoing purposes, whenever possible, in a family environment, recognizing the importance of positive parent-child relationships to the well-being and development of children;

to provide judicial proceedings through which the provisions of the juvenile judicial proceedings chapters are executed and enforced and in which the parties are ensured a fair hearing, and that their constitutional and other legal rights are recognized and enforced.

The provisions of the juvenile judicial proceedings chapters shall be construed as superseding the provisions of the criminal law of this State to the extent the same are inconsistent with this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2009.

Prosecution of adults for crimes committed when juvenile.

Legislative policy expressly seeks to rehabilitate juvenile offenders while removing the taint of criminality and the consequences of criminal behavior. That policy necessarily takes into account that a child who commits an offense between the ages of ten and 14 is still a child and that his or her culpability must be viewed in light of his or her age; thus, the policy is not furthered by automatically subjecting to criminal prosecution adult defendants who committed delinquent acts when they were children under the age of fourteen. In re D.K., 2012 VT 23, 191 Vt. 328, 47 A.3d 347, 2012 Vt. LEXIS 20 (2012).

Cited.

Cited in

In re G.F., 142 Vt. 273, 455 A.2d 805, 1982 Vt. LEXIS 640 (1982); In re Y.B., 143 Vt. 344, 466 A.2d 1167, 1983 Vt. LEXIS 548 (1983); In re T.S., 144 Vt. 592, 481 A.2d 21, 1984 Vt. LEXIS 518 (1984); In re T.L.S., 144 Vt. 536, 481 A.2d 1037, 1984 Vt. LEXIS 513 (1984); In re L.S., 147 Vt. 36, 509 A.2d 1017, 1986 Vt. LEXIS 356 (1986); In re B.J.C., 149 Vt. 196, 540 A.2d 1047, 1988 Vt. LEXIS 4 (1988); In re L.T., 149 Vt. 473, 545 A.2d 522, 1988 Vt. LEXIS 54 (1988); In re C.L., 151 Vt. 480, 563 A.2d 241, 1989 Vt. LEXIS 97 (1989); In re J.H., 156 Vt. 66, 587 A.2d 1009, 1991 Vt. LEXIS 11 (1991); In re P.M., 156 Vt. 303, 592 A.2d 862, 1991 Vt. LEXIS 84 (1991); In re Selivonik, 164 Vt. 383, 670 A.2d 831, 1995 Vt. LEXIS 125 (1995); In re J.M., 2005 VT 62, 178 Vt. 591, 878 A.2d 293, 2005 Vt. LEXIS 149 (2005); In re J.F., 2006 VT 45, 180 Vt. 583, 904 A.2d 1209, 2006 Vt. LEXIS 137 (2006) (mem.).

§ 5101a.
Juvenile justice legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds and declares as public policy that an effective juvenile justice system protects public safety; connects youths and young adults to age-appropriate services that reduce the risk of reoffense; and, when appropriate, shields youths from the adverse impact of a criminal record.

In order to accomplish these goals, the system should be based on the implementation of data-driven evidence-based practices that offer a broad range of alternatives, such that the degree of intervention is commensurate with the risk of reoffense.

High-intensity interventions with low-risk offenders not only decrease program effectiveness, but are contrary to the goal of public safety in that they increase the risk of recidivism. An effective youth justice system includes pre-charge options that keep low-risk offenders out of the criminal justice system altogether.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 201

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 5102.
Definitions and provisions of general application.

As used in the juvenile judicial proceedings chapters:

“Care provider” means a person other than a parent, guardian, or custodian who is providing the child with routine daily care but to whom custody rights have not been transferred by a court.

“Child” means any of the following:

an individual who is under 18 years of age and is a child in need of care or supervision as defined in subdivision (3)(A), (B), or (D) of this section (abandoned, abused, without proper parental care, or truant);

an individual who is under 18 years of age, is a child in need of care or supervision as defined in subdivision (3)(C) of this section (beyond parental control), and was under 16 years of age at the time the petition was filed; or
(B) (i) an individual who is under 18 years of age, is a child in need of care or supervision as defined in subdivision (3)(C) of this section (beyond parental control), and was under 16 years of age at the time the petition was filed; or

an individual who is between 16 and 17.5 years of age, is a child in need of care or supervision as defined in subdivision (3)(C) of this section (beyond parental control), and who is at high risk of serious harm to himself or herself or others due to problems such as substance abuse, prostitution, or homelessness.

An individual who has been alleged to have committed or has committed an act of delinquency after becoming 10 years of age and prior to becoming 22 years of age, unless otherwise provided in chapter 52 or 52A of this title; provided, however:

that an individual who is alleged to have committed an act before attaining 10 years of age that would be murder as defined in

13 V.S.A. § 2301

if committed by an adult may be subject to delinquency proceedings; and

that an individual may be considered a child for the period of time the court retains jurisdiction under section 5104 of this title.

“Child in need of care or supervision (CHINS)” means a child who:

has been abandoned or abused by the child’s parent, guardian, or custodian. A person is considered to have abandoned a child if the person is unwilling to have physical custody of the child; unable, unwilling, or has failed to make appropriate arrangements for the child’s care; unable to have physical custody of the child and has not arranged or cannot arrange for the safe and appropriate care of the child; or has left the child with a care provider and the care provider is unwilling or unable to provide care or support for the child, the whereabouts of the person are unknown, and reasonable efforts to locate the person have been unsuccessful.

is without proper parental care or subsistence, education, medical, or other care necessary for his or her well-being;

is without or beyond the control of his or her parent, guardian, or custodian; or

is habitually and without justification truant from compulsory school attendance.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner for Children and Families or the Commissioner’s designee.

“Conditional custody order” means an order issued by the court in a juvenile proceeding conferring legal custody of a child to a parent, guardian, relative, or a person with a significant relationship with the child subject to such conditions and limitations as the court may deem necessary to provide for the safety and welfare of the child. Any conditions and limitations shall apply only to the individual to whom custody is granted.

“Court” means the Family Division of the Superior Court.

“Custodial parent” means a parent who, at the time of the commencement of the juvenile proceeding, has the right and responsibility to provide the routine daily care and control of the child. The rights of the custodial parent may be held solely or shared and may be subject to the court-ordered right of the other parent to have contact with the child.

“Custodian” means a person other than a parent or legal guardian to whom legal custody of the child has been given by order of a Vermont Superior Court or a similar court in another jurisdiction.

“Delinquent act” means an act designated a crime under the laws of this State, or of another state if the act occurred in another state, or under federal law. A delinquent act shall include a violation of

7 V.S.A. § 656

; however, it shall not include:

snowmobile offenses in 23 V.S.A. chapter 29, subchapter 1 and motorboat offenses in 23 V.S.A. chapter 29, subchapter 2, except for violations of sections 3207a, 3207b, 3207c, 3207d, and 3323;

pursuant to

4 V.S.A. § 33(b)

, felony motor vehicle offenses committed by an individual who is 16 years of age or older, except for violations of 23 V.S.A. chapter 13, subchapter 13 and of

23 V.S.A. § 1091

.

“Delinquent child” means a child who has been adjudicated to have committed a delinquent act.

“Department” means the Department for Children and Families.

“Guardian” means a person who, at the time of the commencement of the juvenile judicial proceeding, has legally established rights to a child pursuant to an order of a Vermont court or a court in another jurisdiction.

“Judge” means a judge of the Family Division of the Superior Court.

“Juvenile judicial proceedings chapters” means this chapter and chapters 52, 52A, and 53 of this title.

“Juvenile proceeding” means a proceeding in the Family Division of the Superior Court under the authority of the juvenile judicial proceedings chapters.

“Custody” means the legal status created by order of the court under the authority of the juvenile judicial proceedings chapters for children under 18 years of age that invests in a party to a juvenile proceeding or another person the following rights and responsibilities:
(16) (A) “Custody” means the legal status created by order of the court under the authority of the juvenile judicial proceedings chapters for children under 18 years of age that invests in a party to a juvenile proceeding or another person the following rights and responsibilities:

the right to routine daily care and control of the child and to determine where and with whom the child shall live;

the authority to consent to major medical, psychiatric, and surgical treatment for a child;

the responsibility to protect and supervise a child and to provide the child with food, shelter, education, and ordinary medical care; and

the authority to make decisions that concern the child and are of substantial legal significance, including the authority to consent to civil marriage and enlistment in the U.S. Armed Forces, and the authority to represent the child in legal actions.

If custody of a child under 18 years of age is transferred to a person other than a parent, the rights, duties, and responsibilities so transferred are subject to the residual parental rights of the parents.

Custody for individuals who are 18 years of age or older means the status created by order of the court under the authority of chapter 52 of this title that invests in the Commissioner the authority to make decisions regarding placements.

“Listed crime” means the same as defined in

13 V.S.A. § 5301

.

“Noncustodial parent” means a parent who is not a custodial parent at the time of the commencement of the juvenile proceeding.

“Officer” means a law enforcement officer, including a State Police officer, sheriff, deputy sheriff, municipal police officer, or constable who has been certified by the Criminal Justice Council pursuant to

20 V.S.A. § 2358

.

“Parent” means a child’s biological or adoptive parent, including custodial parents, noncustodial parents, parents with legal or physical responsibilities or both, and parents whose rights have never been adjudicated.

“Parent-child contact” means the right of a parent to have visitation with the child by court order.

“Party” includes the following persons:

the child with respect to whom the proceedings are brought;

the custodial parent, the guardian, or the custodian of the child in all instances except a hearing on the merits of a delinquency petition;

the noncustodial parent for the purposes of custody, visitation, and such other issues that the court may determine are proper and necessary to the proceedings, provided that the noncustodial parent has entered an appearance;

the State’s Attorney;

the Commissioner for Children and Families;

such other persons as appear to the court to be proper and necessary to the proceedings; and

in youthful offender cases brought under chapter 52A of this title, the Commissioner of Corrections.

“Probation” means the legal status created by order of the Family Division of the Superior Court in proceedings involving a violation of law whereby a delinquent child is subject to supervision by the Department under conditions specified in the court’s juvenile probation certificate and subject to return to and change of legal status by the Family Division of the Superior Court for violation of conditions of probation at any time during the period of probation.

“Protective supervision” means the authority granted by the court to the Department in a juvenile proceeding to take reasonable steps to monitor compliance with the court’s conditional custody order, including unannounced visits to the home in which the child currently resides.

“Reasonable efforts” means the exercise of due diligence by the Department to use appropriate and available services to prevent unnecessary removal of the child from the home or to finalize a permanency plan. When making the reasonable efforts determination, the court may find that no services were appropriate or reasonable considering the circumstances. If the court makes written findings that aggravated circumstances are present, the court may make, but shall not be required to make, written findings as to whether reasonable efforts were made to prevent removal of the child from the home. Aggravated circumstances may exist if:

a court of competent jurisdiction has determined that the parent has subjected a child to abandonment, torture, chronic abuse, or sexual abuse;

a court of competent jurisdiction has determined that the parent has been convicted of murder or manslaughter of a child;

a court of competent jurisdiction has determined that the parent has been convicted of a felony crime that results in serious bodily injury to the child or another child of the parent; or

the parental rights of the parent with respect to a sibling have been involuntarily terminated.

“Residual parental rights and responsibilities” means those rights and responsibilities remaining with the parent after the transfer of legal custody of the child, including the right to reasonable contact with the child, the responsibility for support, and the right to consent to adoption.

“Shelter” means a shelter designated by the Commissioner where a child taken into custody pursuant to subdivision 5301(3) of this title may be held for a period not to exceed seven days.

“Victim” shall have the same meaning as in

13 V.S.A. § 5301(4)

.

“Youth” shall mean a person who is the subject of a motion for youthful offender status or who has been granted youthful offender status.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2009; amended

2009, No. 3

, § 12a, eff. Sept. 1, 2009;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 223, 238;

2015, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 20;

2017, No. 72

, § 3;

2017, No. 83

, § 160;

2019, No. 45

, § 1, eff. May 30, 2019;

2019, No. 124

(Adj. Sess.), § 4.

Parties.

When the paternal grandmother sought to appear in the juvenile proceeding through an attorney after the termination petition was filed and requested visitation, the trial court properly declined to enter her as a party and denied the request for visitation. Grandparents who are not guardians or custodians are not parties in juvenile proceedings; moreover, there is no statutory right to grandparent visitation for children who are the subject of juvenile proceedings. In re C.B., 2020 VT 80, 213 Vt. 215, 249 A.3d 1281, 2020 Vt. LEXIS 94 (2020).

§ 5103.
Jurisdiction.

The Family Division of the Superior Court shall have exclusive jurisdiction over all proceedings concerning a child who is or who is alleged to be a delinquent child or a child in need of care or supervision brought under the authority of the juvenile judicial proceedings chapters, except as otherwise provided in such chapters.

Orders issued under the authority of the juvenile judicial proceedings chapters shall take precedence over orders in other Family Division proceedings and any order of another court of this State, to the extent they are inconsistent. This section shall not apply to child support orders in a divorce, parentage, or relief from abuse proceedings until a child support order has been issued in the juvenile proceeding.

Except as otherwise provided by this title and by subdivision (2) of this subsection, jurisdiction over a child shall not be extended beyond the child’s 18th birthday.
(c) (1) Except as otherwise provided by this title and by subdivision (2) of this subsection, jurisdiction over a child shall not be extended beyond the child’s 18th birthday.

Subdivision (c)(2)(A) effective until July 1, 2022; see also subdivision (c)(2)(A) effective July 1, 2022 set out below.Jurisdiction over a child with a delinquency may be extended until six months beyond the child’s:
(2) (A) Subdivision (c)(2)(A) effective until July 1, 2022; see also subdivision (c)(2)(A) effective July 1, 2022 set out below.Jurisdiction over a child with a delinquency may be extended until six months beyond the child’s:

19th birthday if the child was 16 or 17 years of age when he or she committed the offense; or

20th birthday if the child was 18 years of age when he or she committed the offense.

(2) (A)

Subdivision (c)(2)(A) effective July 1, 2022; see also subdivision (c)(2)(A) effective until July 1, 2022 set out above.
Jurisdiction over a child with a delinquency may be extended until six months beyond the child’s:

(i)

19th birthday if the child was 16 or 17 years of age when he or she committed the offense;

(ii)

20th birthday if the child was 18 years of age when he or she committed the offense; or

21st birthday if the child was 19 years of age when he or she committed the offense.

Except for custody of individuals 18 years of age or older that may be ordered by the court under the authority of chapter 52 of this title, custody of a child or youth 18 years of age or older shall not be retained by or transferred to the Commissioner for Children and Families.

Jurisdiction over a child in need of care or supervision shall not be extended beyond the child’s 18th birthday.

Jurisdiction over a youthful offender shall not extend beyond the youth’s 22nd birthday.

The court may terminate its jurisdiction over a child prior to the child’s 18th birthday by order of the court. If the child is not subject to another juvenile proceeding, jurisdiction shall terminate automatically in the following circumstances:

upon the discharge of a child from juvenile or youthful offender probation, provided the child is not in the legal custody of the Commissioner;

upon an order of the court transferring legal custody to a parent, guardian, or custodian without conditions or protective supervision;

upon the adoption of a child following a termination of parental rights proceeding.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2009; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 224;

2011, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2015, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. Jan. 1, 2018;

2017, No. 201

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. May 30, 2018;

2019, No. 45

, § 2, eff. May 30, 2019;

2019, No. 124

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2019, No. 124

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. July 1, 2022;

2021, No. 65

, §§ 14, 15, eff. June 7, 2021.

Particular cases.

As the family court plainly had jurisdiction over the category of case and was explicitly authorized to approve a written stipulation to the merits of the petition, even if it improperly adjudicated a child as a child in need of care or supervision based on the mother’s stipulation alone, the judgment was not void for lack of subject-matter jurisdiction. For the same reason, the parents’ argument that the adjudication was not supported by sufficient evidence because it was based on pre-birth circumstances was insufficient to render the judgment void. In re C.L.S., 2020 VT 1, 211 Vt. 344, 225 A.3d 644, 2020 Vt. LEXIS 1 (2020).

Child-in-need-of-care-or-supervision (CHINS) merits decision was final and not void pursuant to a belated collateral attack. The family court had jurisdiction over the child-neglect proceeding and also had the ability to issue a CHINS decision pursuant to Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act emergency jurisdiction; thus, even if the exercise of emergency jurisdiction was “ill-advised,” in the context of this collateral attack, the underlying order was not void as a matter of law on subject-matter-jurisdiction grounds. In re C.P., 2012 VT 100, 193 Vt. 29, 71 A.3d 1142, 2012 Vt. LEXIS 98 (2012).

Statutory scheme in place when defendant was charged in 2010 for crimes he allegedly committed when he was a juvenile provided the Family Division with exclusive original jurisdiction to adjudicate charges alleging delinquent acts committed by defendants 14 years of age. The Family Division’s jurisdiction over juvenile delinquency proceedings is exclusive and takes precedence over any inconsistent criminal law provisions, but normally ends when the juvenile reaches 18 years of age. In re D.K., 2012 VT 23, 191 Vt. 328, 47 A.3d 347, 2012 Vt. LEXIS 20 (2012).

When defendant, an adult, was charged with offenses alleged to have occurred when he was a juvenile between the ages of ten and 14 years, the Family Division’s exclusive original jurisdiction terminated upon defendant having reached 18 years of age, and the Family Division properly dismissed the State’s delinquency petition for lack of subject matter jurisdiction. There was no support for the State’s position that even assuming the Family Division properly dismissed the delinquency petition under the applicable law, the criminal division retained jurisdiction in this case by virtue of its general jurisdiction over criminal offenses such as sexual assault. In re D.K., 2012 VT 23, 191 Vt. 328, 47 A.3d 347, 2012 Vt. LEXIS 20 (2012).

§ 5104.
Repealed. 2017, No. 72, § 8(a), effective July 1, 2018.

§ 5105.
Venue and change of venue.

Proceedings under the juvenile judicial proceedings chapters may be commenced in the county where:

the child is domiciled;

the acts constituting the alleged delinquency occurred; or

the child is present when the proceedings commenced, if it is alleged that a child is in need of care or supervision.

If a child or a parent, guardian, or custodian changes domicile during the course of a proceeding under the juvenile judicial proceedings chapters or if the petition is not brought in the county in which the child is domiciled, the court may change venue upon the motion of a party or its own motion, taking into consideration the domicile of the child and the convenience of the parties and witnesses.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2009.

§ 5106.
Powers and duties of Commissioner.

Subject to the limitations of the juvenile judicial proceedings chapters or those imposed by the court, and in addition to any other powers granted to the Commissioner under the laws of this State, the Commissioner has the following authority with respect to a child who is or may be the subject of a petition brought under the juvenile judicial proceedings chapters:

To undertake assessments and make reports and recommendations to the court as authorized by the juvenile judicial proceedings chapters.

To investigate complaints and allegations that a child is in need of care or supervision for the purpose of considering the commencement of proceedings under the juvenile judicial proceedings chapters.

To supervise and assist a child who is placed under the Commissioner’s supervision or in the Commissioner’s legal custody by order of the court, and to administer sanctions in accordance with graduated sanctions established by policy and that are consistent with the juvenile probation certificate.

To place a child who is in the Commissioner’s legal custody in a family home or a treatment, rehabilitative, detention, or educational facility or institution subject to the provisions of sections 5292 and 5293 of this title. To the extent that it is appropriate and possible, siblings in the Commissioner’s custody shall be placed together.

To make appropriate referrals to private or public agencies.

To perform such other functions as are designated by the juvenile judicial proceedings chapters.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2009; amended

2015, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 13.

§ 5107.
Contempt power.

Subject to the laws relating to the procedures therefor and the limitations thereon, the court has the power to punish any person for contempt of court for disobeying an order of the court or for obstructing or interfering with the proceedings of the court or the enforcement of its orders.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2009.

§ 5108.
Authority to issue warrants.

The court may order a parent, guardian, or custodian to appear at any hearing or to appear at the hearing with the child who is the subject of a petition.

If, after being summoned, cited, or otherwise notified to appear, a party fails to do so, the court may issue a warrant for the person’s appearance.

If the child is with the parent, guardian, or custodian, the court may issue a warrant for the person to appear in court with the child or, in the alternative, the court may issue an order for an officer to pick up the child and bring the child to court.

If a summons cannot be served or the welfare of the child requires that the child be brought forthwith to the court, the court may issue a warrant for the parent, guardian, or custodian to appear in court with the child. In the alternative, the court may issue an order for an officer to pick up the child and bring the child to court during court hours.

A person summoned who fails to appear without reasonable cause may be found in contempt of court.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2009.

§ 5109.
Subpoena.

Upon application of a party or on the court’s own motion, the clerk of the court shall issue subpoenas requiring attendance and testimony of witnesses and production of papers at any hearing under the juvenile judicial proceedings chapters.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2009.

§ 5110.
Conduct of hearings.

Hearings under the juvenile judicial proceedings chapters shall be conducted by the court without a jury and shall be confidential.

The general public shall be excluded from hearings under the juvenile judicial proceedings chapters, and only the parties, their counsel, witnesses, persons accompanying a party for his or her assistance, and such other persons as the court finds to have a proper interest in the case or in the work of the court, including a foster parent or a representative of a residential program where the child resides, may be admitted by the court. An individual without party status seeking inclusion in the hearing in accordance with this subsection may petition the court for admittance by filing a request with the clerk of the court. This subsection shall not prohibit a victim’s exercise of his or her rights under sections 5233 and 5234 of this title, and as otherwise provided by law.

There shall be no publicity given by any person to any proceedings under the authority of the juvenile judicial proceedings chapters except with the consent of the child, the child’s guardian ad litem, and the child’s parent, guardian, or custodian. A person who violates this provision may be subject to contempt proceedings pursuant to Rule 16 of the Vermont Rules for Family Proceedings.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2009; amended

2015, No. 60

, § 6.

§ 5111.
Noncustodial parents.

If a child is placed in the legal custody of the Department and the identity of a parent has not been legally established at the time the petition is filed, the court may order that the child and the child’s alleged genetic parents submit to genetic testing and may issue an order establishing parentage pursuant to 15C V.S.A. chapters 1-8 (parentage proceedings). A parentage order issued pursuant to this subsection shall not be deemed to be a confidential record.

If a child is placed in the legal custody of the Department, the Department shall make reasonably diligent efforts to locate a noncustodial parent as early in the proceedings as possible, and notify the court of the noncustodial parent’s address. A hearing shall not be delayed by reason of the inability of the Department to locate or serve a noncustodial parent.

The court may order a custodial parent to provide the Department with information regarding the identity and location of a noncustodial parent.

As soon as his or her address is known, a noncustodial parent shall be served with the petition and a copy of the summons. Thereafter, the court shall mail notices of the hearing to the noncustodial parent. The noncustodial parent shall be responsible for providing the court with information regarding any changes in address.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2009; amended

2019, No. 24

, § 6.

§ 5112.
Attorney and guardian ad litem for child.

The court shall appoint an attorney for a child who is a party to a proceeding brought under the juvenile judicial proceedings chapters.

The court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for a child under 18 years of age who is a party to a proceeding brought under the juvenile judicial proceedings chapters. In a delinquency proceeding, a parent, guardian, or custodian of the child may serve as a guardian ad litem for the child, providing his or her interests do not conflict with the interests of the child. The guardian ad litem appointed under this section shall not be a party to that proceeding or an employee or representative of such party.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2009; amended

2017, No. 72

, § 4.

§ 5113.
Modification or vacation of orders.

An order of the court may be set aside in accordance with Rule 60 of the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure.

Upon motion of a party or the court’s own motion, the court may amend, modify, set aside, or vacate an order on the grounds that a change in circumstances requires such action to serve the best interests of the child. The motion shall set forth in concise language the grounds upon which the relief is requested.

Any order under this section shall be made after notice and hearing; however, the court may waive the hearing upon stipulation of the parties. All evidence helpful in determining the questions presented, including hearsay, may be admitted and relied upon to the extent of its probative value, even though not competent in a hearing on the petition.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2009.